Maryland, session 2026, HB1102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
31–2B–09.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A LOCAL DETENTION
CENTER OFFICER OF ALLEGANY COUNTY BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE AND WHO
REMAINS A LOCAL DETENTION CENTER OFFICER OF ALLEGANY COUNTY THROUGH
THE EFFECTIVE DATE.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, IF ALLEGANY
COUNTY BECOMES A PARTICIPATING GOVERNMENTAL UNIT IN THE CORRECTIONAL
OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM, MEMBERSHIP IN THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS’
RETIREMENT SYSTEM IS MANDATORY FOR AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) IF ALLEGANY COUNTY COMMENCES PARTICIPATION IN THE
CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION IS ENTITLED TO ELIGIBILITY SERVICE AND CREDITABLE
SERVICE IN THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM FOR
– 1 –

Ch. 179 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
EMPLOYMENT WITH ALLEGANY COUNTY BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE.
(D) ON JOINING THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM
AND RECEIVING SERVICE CREDIT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL:
(1) NO LONGER BE A MEMBER OF THE EMPLOYEES’ PENSION
SYSTEM; AND
(2) HAVE NO FURTHER RIGHTS TO ANY BENEFIT IN THE EMPLOYEES’
PENSION SYSTEM.
(E) THE TRANSFER OF CREDITABLE SERVICE FOR AN INDIVIDUAL
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION WHO IS A MEMBER OF THE
EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM THROUGH THE EFFECTIVE DATE, AND WHO
TRANSFERS TO THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM UNDER THIS
SECTION, IS NOT GOVERNED BY TITLE 37 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(F) IF ALLEGANY COUNTY BECOMES A PARTICIPATING GOVERNMENTAL
UNIT IN THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM, § 31–2B–05(C) OF
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL GOVERN THE TRANSFER AND CREDITING OF ASSETS ON THE
EFFECTIVE DATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –